Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-698
Purpose of registry.

The purpose of the Parkinson's Disease Registry is to provide a central data bank of accurate, historical and current information for research purposes. The Parkinson's Disease Registry Act will provide for screening and collecting patient and family data that may be useful in detecting the incidence of and possible risk factors concerning Parkinson's disease and related movement disorders. The act will also aid in planning for health care requirements and education needs.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 6.